Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 2 Long-Arm Statutes
20-2-223. Personal jurisdiction based on conduct.

A court may exercise personal jurisdiction over a person, who acts directly or indirectly, as to a claim for relief arising from the person's:

Transacting any business in this state;

Contracting to supply services or things in this state;

Causing tortious injury by an act or omission in this state;

Causing tortious injury in this state by an act or omission outside this state of the person who regularly does or solicits business, or engages in any other persistent course of conduct, or derives substantial revenue from goods used or consumed or services rendered, in this state;

Having an interest in, using or possessing real property in this state;

Contracting to insure any person, property or risk located within this state at the time of contracting; or

Conduct as a director or officer of a domestic corporation or the conduct of a domestic corporation while the person held office as a director or officer.

When jurisdiction over a person is based solely upon this section, only a claim for relief arising from acts enumerated in this section may be asserted against that person.

Acts 1997, ch. 226, § 1.

Law Reviews.

A Tale of Two Jurisdictions, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 501 (2015).

Federal Civil Procedure — Personal Jurisdiction — General Jurisdiction Over Foreign Corporations Based Upon Domestic Subsidiary Activity Within The Forum State, 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 461 (2015).

Cited: Bridgeport Music v. Agarita Music, 182 F. Supp. 2d 653, 2002 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1775 (M.D. Tenn. 2002); State v. NV Sumatra Tobacco Trading Co., 403 S.W.3d 726, 2013 Tenn. LEXIS 335 (Tenn. Mar. 28, 2013).

20-2-224. Service outside the state.

When the exercise of personal jurisdiction is authorized by §§20-2-221 —20-2-223, this section and § 20-2-225, service may be made outside this state in the manner provided by the Tennessee rules of civil procedure or as otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1997, ch. 226, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Personal Jurisdiction — A State's Ability to Exercise Jurisdiction over a Foreign Manufacturer, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 339 (2014).

20-2-225. Other bases of jurisdiction unaffected — Jurisdiction whenever permitted by constitution.

A court of this state may exercise jurisdiction:

On any other basis authorized by law; or

On any basis not inconsistent with the constitution of this state or of the United States.

Acts 1997, ch. 226, § 1.

Law Reviews.

A Tale of Two Jurisdictions, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 501 (2015).

Back to the Basics: Resisting Novel and Extreme Approaches to the Law of Personal Jurisdiction and the Internet, 30 U. Mem. L. Rev. 157 (1999).

Constitutional Law — Personal Jurisdiction — A State's Ability to Exercise Jurisdiction over a Foreign Manufacturer, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 339 (2014).

Federal Civil Procedure — Personal Jurisdiction — General Jurisdiction Over Foreign Corporations Based Upon Domestic Subsidiary Activity Within The Forum State, 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 461 (2015).

Rethinking Conspiracy Jurisdiction in Light of Stream of Commerce and Effects-Based Jurisdictional Principles, 71 Vand. L. Rev. 1333 (May 2018).

20-2-226. Service on the secretary of state—Collection of fee.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) each time process is served on the secretary of state under this chapter, or pursuant to the convention on the service abroad of judicial and extrajudicial documents in civil or commercial matters, signed at The Hague, November 15, 1965, commonly referred to as “The Hague Convention.” The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if such party prevails in the proceeding.

Acts 1998, ch. 890, § 8.